Missouri, session 2026, HB3304.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 578.009 and 578.024, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 578.009 and 578.024, to read as follows:
578.009. 1. A person commits the offense of animal neglect if he or she:
(1) Has custody or ownership of an animal and fails to provide adequate care; [or]
(2) Has custody or ownership of an animal, excluding livestock as defined in
section 265.300, and fails to provide adequate control; or
(3) Knowingly abandons an animal in any place without making provisions for its
adequate care or adequate control.
2. The offense of animal neglect is a class C misdemeanor unless the person:
(1) Has previously been found guilty of an offense under this section, or an offense in
another jurisdiction which would constitute an offense under this section, in which case it is a
class B misdemeanor;
(2) Fails to provide adequate care or adequate control that results in property
damage of another, in which case it is a class B misdemeanor; however, if such damage
exceeds seven hundred fifty dollars, it is a class E felony;
(3) Fails to provide adequate care or adequate control that results in physical
injury, as defined in 556.061, to a person, in which case it is a class A misdemeanor;
(4) Fails to provide adequate care or adequate control that results in serious
physical injury, as defined in section 556.061, to a person, in which case it is a class E
felony; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3304 2
(5) Fails to provide adequate care or adequate control that results in death to a
person, in which case it is a class D felony.
3. [All fines and penalties for a first finding of guilt under this section may be waived
by the court if the person found guilty of animal neglect shows that adequate, permanent
remedies for the neglect have been made. Reasonable costs incurred for the care and
maintenance of neglected animals may not be waived. This section shall not apply to the
provisions of section 578.007 or chapter 272.
4.] In addition to any other penalty imposed by this section, the court may order a
person found guilty of animal neglect to pay all reasonable costs and expenses necessary for:
(1) The care and maintenance of neglected animals within the person's custody or
ownership;
(2) The disposal of any dead or diseased animals within the person's custody or
ownership;
(3) The reduction of resulting organic debris affecting the immediate area of the
neglect; and
(4) The avoidance or minimization of any public health risks created by the neglect of
the animals.
4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to the acts or facilities
exempted under section 578.007.
578.024. 1. A person commits the offense of keeping a dangerous dog if he or she
owns or possesses a dog that has previously bitten a person or a domestic animal without
provocation and that dog bites any person on a subsequent occasion.
2. The offense of keeping a dangerous dog is a class B misdemeanor, unless such
attack:
(1) Results in serious physical injury, as defined in section 556.061, to any person,
in which case, it is a class A misdemeanor; or
(2) Results in serious physical injury, as defined in section 556.061, to any person
and [any previous attack also resulted] the dog has previously attacked a person resulting
in serious physical injury [to any person], in which case[,] it is a class E felony; or
(3) Results in the death of any person, in which case[,] it is a class D felony.
3. In addition to the penalty included in subsection 2 of this section, if any dog that
has previously bitten a person or a domestic animal without provocation bites any person on a
subsequent occasion or if a dog that has not previously bitten a person attacks and causes
serious physical injury to or the death of any human, the dog shall be seized immediately by
an animal control authority or by the county sheriff. The dog shall be impounded and held for
ten business days after the owner or possessor is given written notification and thereafter
destroyed.

HCS HB 3304 3
4. The owner or possessor of the dog that has been impounded may file a written
appeal to the circuit court to contest the impoundment and destruction of such dog. The
owner or possessor shall provide notice of the filing of the appeal to the animal control
authority or county sheriff who seized the dog. If the owner or possessor files such an appeal
and provides proper notice, the dog shall remain impounded and shall not be destroyed while
such appeal is pending and until the court issues an order for the destruction of the dog. The
court shall hold a disposition hearing within thirty days of the filing of the appeal to
determine whether such dog shall be humanely destroyed. The court may order the owner or
possessor of the dog to pay the costs associated with the animal's keeping and care during the
pending appeal.
5. Notwithstanding any provision of sections 273.033 and 273.036, section 578.022
and this section to the contrary, if a dog attacks or bites a person who is engaged in or
attempting to engage in a criminal activity at the time of the attack, the owner or possessor is
not guilty of any crime specified under this section or section 273.036, and is not civilly liable
under this section or section 273.036, nor shall such dog be destroyed as provided in
subsection 3 of this section, nor shall such person engaged in or attempting to engage in a
criminal activity at the time of the attack be entitled to the defenses set forth in section
273.033. For purposes of this section "criminal activity" shall not include the act of trespass
upon private property under section 569.150 as long as the trespasser does not otherwise
engage in, attempt to engage in, or have intent to engage in other criminal activity nor shall it
include any trespass upon private property by a person under the age of twelve under section
569.140.
✔